Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.010

Intent.

The legislature finds that minority and women-owned businesses are significantly underrepresented and have been denied equitable competitive opportunities in contracting. It is the intent of this chapter to mitigate societal discrimination and other factors in participating in public works and in providing goods and services and to delineate a policy that an increased level of participation by minority and women-owned and controlled businesses is desirable at all levels of state government. The purpose and intent of this chapter are to provide the maximum practicable opportunity for increased participation by minority and women-owned and controlled businesses in participating in public works and the process by which goods and services are procured by state agencies and educational institutions from the private sector.

[ 1987 c 328 s 1; 1983 c 120 s 1.]